Illinois, session 104th, HB3360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice 5Act of 2004 is amended by changing Sections 3 and 8.1 and by 6adding Section 29 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 115/3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7003)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)9    Sec. 3. Definitions. The following terms have the meanings 10indicated, unless the context requires otherwise:11    "Accredited college of veterinary medicine" means a 12veterinary college, school, or division of a university or 13college that offers the degree of Doctor of Veterinary 14Medicine or its equivalent and that is accredited by the 15Council on Education of the American Veterinary Medical 16Association (AVMA).17    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 18by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 19file or license file as maintained by the Department's 20licensure maintenance unit. 21    "Accredited program in veterinary technology" means any 22post-secondary educational program that is accredited by the 23AVMA's Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and   HB3360 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1Activities or any veterinary technician program that is 2recognized as its equivalent by the AVMA's Committee on 3Veterinary Technician Education and Activities. 4    "Animal" means any animal, vertebrate or invertebrate, 5other than a human.6    "Board" means the Veterinary Licensing and Disciplinary 7Board.8    "Certified veterinary technician" or "veterinary 9technician" means a person who is a graduate of a veterinary 10technician program accredited by the AVMA's Committee on 11Veterinary Technician Education and Activities and who has 12successfully passed the Veterinary Technician National 13Examination approved by the Board. The title "certified 14veterinary technician", "veterinary technician", "vet tech", 15or "technician" and the initials "CVT" or "VT" may only be used 16by persons certified by the Department. "Certified veterinary 17technician" means a person who is validly and currently 18licensed to practice veterinary technology in this State.19    "Client" means an entity, person, group, or corporation 20that has entered into an agreement with a veterinarian for the 21purposes of obtaining veterinary medical services.22    "Complementary, alternative, and integrative therapies" 23means a heterogeneous group of diagnostic and therapeutic 24philosophies and practices, which at the time they are 25performed may differ from current scientific knowledge, or 26whose theoretical basis and techniques may diverge from   HB3360 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1veterinary medicine routinely taught in accredited veterinary 2medical colleges, or both. "Complementary, alternative, and 3integrative therapies" includes include, but is are not 4limited to, veterinary acupuncture, acutherapy, and 5acupressure; veterinary homeopathy; veterinary manual or 6manipulative therapy or therapy based on techniques practiced 7in osteopathy, chiropractic medicine, or physical medicine and 8therapy; veterinary nutraceutical therapy; veterinary 9phytotherapy; and other therapies as defined by rule.10    "Consultation" means when a veterinarian receives advice 11in person, telephonically, electronically, or by any other 12method of communication from a veterinarian licensed in this 13or any other state or other person whose expertise, in the 14opinion of the veterinarian, would benefit a patient. Under 15any circumstance, the responsibility for the welfare of the 16patient remains with the veterinarian receiving consultation.17    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation.19    "Direct supervision" means the supervising veterinarian is 20readily available on the premises where the animal is being 21treated.22    "Email address of record" means the designated email 23address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 24application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 25by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 26    "Immediate supervision" means the supervising veterinarian   HB3360 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1is in the immediate area, within audible and visual range of 2the patient and the person treating the patient. 3    "Impaired veterinarian" means a veterinarian who is unable 4to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and 5safety because of a physical or mental disability as evidenced 6by a written determination or written consent based on 7clinical evidence, including deterioration through the aging 8process, loss of motor skills, or abuse of drugs or alcohol of 9sufficient degree to diminish a person's ability to deliver 10competent patient care.11    "Indirect supervision" means the supervising veterinarian 12need not be on the premises, but has given either written or 13oral instructions for the treatment of the animal and is 14available by telephone or other form of communication.15    "Licensed veterinarian" means a person who is validly and 16currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this 17State. 18    "Patient" means an animal or group of animals that is 19examined or treated by a veterinarian.20    "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership (general, 21limited, or limited liability), association, joint venture, 22cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, or any 23other group or combination acting in concert, whether or not 24acting as a principal, partner, member, trustee, fiduciary, 25receiver, or any other kind of legal or personal 26representative, or as the successor in interest, assignee,   HB3360 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1agent, factor, servant, employee, director, officer, or any 2other representative of such person.3    "Practice of veterinary medicine" means to diagnose, 4prognose, treat, correct, change, alleviate, or prevent animal 5disease, illness, pain, deformity, defect, injury, or other 6physical, dental, or mental conditions by any method or mode, 7such as telemedicine, including the performance of one or more 8of the following:9        (1) Prescribing, dispensing, administering, applying, 10    or ordering the administration of any drug, medicine, 11    biologic, apparatus, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or 12    diagnostic substance, or medical or surgical technique.13        (2) (Blank).14        (3) Performing upon an animal a surgical or dental 15    operation.16        (3.5) Performing upon an animal complementary, 17    alternative, or integrative therapy. 18        (4) Performing upon an animal any manual or mechanical 19    procedure for reproductive management, including the 20    diagnosis or treatment of pregnancy, sterility, or 21    infertility.22        (4.5) The rendering of advice or recommendation by any 23    means, including telephonic and other electronic 24    communications, with regard to the performing upon an 25    animal any manual or mechanical procedure for reproductive 26    management, including the diagnosis or treatment of   HB3360 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1    pregnancy, sterility, or infertility.2        (5) Determining the health and fitness of an animal.3        (6) Representing oneself, directly or indirectly, as 4    engaging in the practice of veterinary medicine.5        (7) Using any word, letters, or title under such 6    circumstances as to induce the belief that the person 7    using them is qualified to engage in the practice of 8    veterinary medicine or any of its branches. Such use shall 9    be prima facie evidence of the intention to represent 10    oneself as engaging in the practice of veterinary 11    medicine.12    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 13Professional Regulation. 14    "Supervising veterinarian" means a veterinarian who 15assumes responsibility for the professional care given to an 16animal by a person working under his or her direction in either 17an immediate, direct, or indirect supervision arrangement. The 18supervising veterinarian must have examined the animal at such 19time as acceptable veterinary medical practices require 20requires, consistent with the particular delegated animal 21health care task.22    "Therapeutic" means the treatment, control, and prevention 23of disease. 24    "Veterinarian" means a person who is validly and currently 25licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this State. 26    "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means that all   HB3360 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1of the following conditions have been met:2        (1) The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility 3    for making clinical judgments regarding the health of an 4    animal and the need for medical treatment and the client, 5    owner, or other caretaker has agreed to follow the 6    instructions of the veterinarian;7        (2) There is sufficient knowledge of an animal by the 8    veterinarian to initiate at least a general or preliminary 9    diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal. This 10    means that the veterinarian has recently seen and is 11    personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the 12    animal by virtue of an in-person examination of the animal 13    or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the 14    premises where the animal is kept, or the veterinarian has 15    access to the patient's records and has been designated by 16    the veterinarian with the prior relationship to provide 17    reasonable and appropriate medical care if the 18    veterinarian with the prior relationship is unavailable; 19    and20        (3) The practicing veterinarian is readily available 21    for follow-up in case of adverse reactions or failure of 22    the treatment regimen or, if unavailable, has designated 23    another available veterinarian who has access to the 24    patient's records to provide reasonable and appropriate 25    medical care.26    "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" does not mean a   HB3360 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1relationship solely based on telephonic or other electronic 2communications.3    "Veterinary medicine" means all branches and specialties 4included within the practice of veterinary medicine.5    "Veterinary premises" means any premises or facility where 6the practice of veterinary medicine occurs, including, but not 7limited to, a mobile clinic, outpatient clinic, satellite 8clinic, or veterinary hospital or clinic. "Veterinary 9premises" does not mean the premises of a veterinary client, 10research facility, a federal military base, or an accredited 11college of veterinary medicine.12    "Veterinary prescription drugs" means those drugs 13restricted to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian 14in accordance with Section 503(f) of the Federal Food, Drug, 15and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 353).16    "Veterinary specialist" means a veterinarian: (1) who has 17been awarded and maintains certification from a veterinary 18specialty organization recognized by the American Board of 19Veterinary Specialties; (2) who has been awarded and maintains 20certification from a veterinary certifying organization whose 21standards have been found by the Board to be equivalent to or 22more stringent than those of American Board of Veterinary 23Specialties-recognized veterinary specialty organizations; or 24(3) who otherwise meets criteria that may be established by 25the Board to support a claim to be a veterinary specialist. 26    "Veterinary technology" means the performance of services   HB3360 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1within the field of veterinary medicine by a person who, for 2compensation or personal profit, is employed by a licensed 3veterinarian to perform duties that require an understanding 4of veterinary medicine necessary to carry out the orders of 5the veterinarian pursuant to 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1500.48 and 68 6Ill. Adm. Code 1500.60. Those services, however, shall not 7include diagnosing, prognosing, prescribing, or surgery.8(Source: P.A. 103-309, eff. 1-1-24; 103-505, eff. 1-1-24; 9revised 8-6-24.) 10    (225 ILCS 115/8.1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7008.1)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)12    Sec. 8.1. Certified veterinary technician. A person who is 13a certified veterinary technician who performs veterinary 14technology contrary to this Act is guilty of a Class A 15misdemeanor and shall be subject to the revocation of his or 16her certificate. However, these penalties and restrictions 17shall not apply to a student while performing activities 18required as a part of his or her training.19    The Department and the Board are authorized to hold 20hearings, reprimand, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or 21renew a certificate and to perform any other acts that may be 22necessary to regulate certified veterinary technicians in a 23manner consistent with the provisions of the Act applicable to 24veterinarians.25    The title "certified veterinary technician", "veterinary   HB3360 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09795 AAS 19861 b1technician", "vet tech", or "technician" "Certified veterinary 2technician" and the initials "CVT" or "VT" may only be used by 3persons certified by the Department. A person who uses these 4titles without the certification as provided in this Section 5is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.6    Certified veterinary technicians shall be required to 7complete continuing education as prescribed by rule to renew 8their certification.9(Source: P.A. 93-281, eff. 12-31-03.) 10    (225 ILCS 115/29 new)11    Sec. 29. Display of license. Every holder of a license 12shall display the license or a copy of the license in a 13conspicuous place in the holder's principal office or any 14other location where the holder renders services as a 15veterinarian or a certified veterinary technician. Every 16displayed license shall have the license number visible.